New Jersey, session 222, A869.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  The Department of Education shall conduct a study on the number of students who are caregivers and the impact on student academic outcomes. b.    The study shall include, but not be limited to: (1) identification of issues experienced by high school students enrolled in public and nonpublic schools in the State who are primary caregivers in their home; (2) a review of absenteeism rates for students who identify as caregivers; and (3) a review of student academic outcomes, including high school graduation and college enrollment rates, of students who identify as caregivers. c.     Within one year of the effective date of this act, the Commissioner of Education shall prepare and submit a written report of the studys findings to the Governor and, pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), to the Legislature.  The report shall also include any recommendations, if applicable, regarding the development of a program to address issues identified in the study. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.